Utah statutes.
72-4-127.   State highways -- SR-212, SR-215, SR-218, SR-219.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-212.  From the northwest frontage road of Washington Interchange southeasterly; then northeasterly and easterly to 300 East Street in Washington.

(2)  SR-215.  From a junction with Route 80 near the mouth of Parley's Canyon southeast of Salt Lake City, southwesterly to near the south city limits of Murray, junctioning with Route 15, then northwesterly, northerly, and easterly to a junction with Route 15 north of Salt Lake City, on interstate Route 215.

(3)  SR-218.  From Route 23 east of Newton easterly to Route 91 in Smithfield.

(4)  SR-219.  From the 1984 west corporate limits of Enterprise east to Route 18.

